Nebraska, session 109, LB727.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Authorized forms of epinephrine means an epinephrine autoinjector or
nasal epinephrine;
(b) Administer means the direct application of an authorized form of
epinephrine to the body of an individual;
(c) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(d) Epinephrine autoinjector means a single-use device used for the
automatic injection of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body;
(e) Law enforcement agency means the police department or town marshal in
incorporated municipalities, the office of the sheriff in unincorporated areas,
and the Nebraska State Patrol;
(f) Law enforcement officer means any member of the Nebraska State Patrol,
any county or deputy sheriff, any member of the police force of any city or
village, or any other public official authorized by a city or village to
enforce state or local laws, rules, regulations, or ordinances; and
(g) Nasal epinephrine means a needle-free, prescription nasal spray
containing epinephrine intended for the emergency treatment of allergic
reactions.
(2) Subject to the requirements of this section and any rules and
regulations of the department:
(a) A law enforcement agency may obtain, maintain, and possess authorized
forms of epinephrine to be provided to or made available to such agency's law
enforcement officers pursuant to this section for use while in the performance
of official duties; and
(b) A law enforcement officer may administer authorized forms of
epinephrine in response to an emergency situation while in the performance of
such officer's official duties.
(3) The department shall, in consultation with law enforcement agencies,
approve one or more educational training programs relating to responding to an
anaphylaxis event, including the use of authorized forms of epinephrine, that
law enforcement officers may complete in order to be provided and administer
authorized forms of epinephrine pursuant to this section. Any such program
shall provide a law enforcement officer with a certificate of completion for
successful completion of such program.
(4)(a) A law enforcement agency shall not provide or make available
authorized forms of epinephrine to a law enforcement officer until such officer
has provided such law enforcement agency with a copy of a certificate of
completion of a program described in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) A law enforcement officer shall complete an approved educational
training program pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and provide a
certificate of completion to the officer's agency prior to administering
authorized forms of epinephrine in the performance of such officer's official
duties.
(5) Nothing in this section shall require:
(a) A law enforcement agency to obtain authorized forms of epinephrine or
make such authorized forms of epinephrine available to law enforcement
officers; or
(b) A law enforcement officer to carry or administer authorized forms of
epinephrine.
(6) The department may issue a standing order authorizing law enforcement
agencies to purchase authorized forms of epinephrine.
(7) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out this section.
-1-